Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 803.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 8. a. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the county in which an offense was committed cannot be readily determined, trial of the offense shall be held in the county of residence of the victim. b. If there is no victim, the victim is not a resident of this state, or the residence of the victim cannot be established, trial of the offense shall be held in the county of residence of the person charged with the offense. c. If the victim is not a natural person, venue for trial of the offense is proper in any county where the victim has a physical presence. d. If there is more than one victim, trial of the offenses may be held in any county in which a victim resides with the House File 647, p. 2 county of residence of a natural person taking priority over the county of residence of other victims. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 647, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor